District of Columbia statutes.
9-113.03

Repealed

Council may change names of streets when 2 streets have same name.

Repealed.

June 30, 1898, 30 Stat. 532, ch. 540
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 702, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-106.